Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Cross references.

Exemption from securities-registration requirements for securities issued by or guaranteed by public utilities, common carriers, etc., § 10-5-8.

Criminal penalty for damaging, injuring, or interfering with public utility properties, §

16-7-25

.

Prohibition against suspension of gas or electrical service for failure to make payments on appliances purchased from or repaired by gas or electric utility company, §

16-12-3

.

Prohibition against political campaign contributions by persons acting on behalf of public utility regulated by Public Service Commission, §

21-5-10

.

Blasting or excavating operations near underground gas pipes and other underground utility facilities, Ch. 9, T. 25.

Removal and relocation of public utility facilities pursuant to construction or maintenance of public road by Department of Transportation, §

32-6-170

et seq.

Mass transportation, Ch. 9, T. 32.

Sale, lease, etc., of public utility plants or properties by municipalities, §

36-37-7

et seq.

Taxation of special franchises, §

48-5-420

et seq.

Ad valorem taxation of public utilities, §

48-5-510

et seq.

Taxation of income of public service corporations, §

48-7-32

.

Law reviews.

For article, “The New Special Master Rule — Uniform Superior Court Rule 46: Life Jackets for the Courts in the Perfect Storm,”
see 15 (No. 4) Ga. St. B.J. 20 (2009).